District of Columbia statutes.
4-1103

Appropriations.

There is authorized to be appropriated funds necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-210, § 4, 36 DCR 478

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-1103.